Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-229
Joint agreements; condemnation proceedings; property acquired held as tenants in common.

Condemnation proceedings shall be instituted, in the names of the municipalities jointly, and the property acquired shall be held by the municipalities as tenants in common. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724.

Laws 1945, c. 34, § 11(9), p. 168;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 28, p. 459.

Condemnation may be instituted by municipalities jointly. Spencer v. Village of Wallace, 153 Neb. 536, 45 N.W.2d 473 (1951).